test.twolc
!! =================================== !
!! The Quenya morphophonological/twol rules file !
!! =================================== !

Alphabet
    a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y
    á é í ó ú ä ë ï ö ü þ ñ %{w%}

    A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y
    Á É Í Ó Ú Ä Ë Ï Ö Ü Þ Ñ

    ! things to automatically convert (unless otherwise specified below)
    %>:0

    %{stemd20%}:d %{stemt20%}:t %{stemm2n%}:m %{stems20%}:s %{stemn20%}:n
    %{stemu2o%}:u
    %{steme2é%}:e %{stemi2í%}:i

    %{%-V%}:0
    %{L%}:l

    %{strongi%}:i

;

Sets
    Vowel = a e i o u á é í ó ú ä ë ï ö ü
            A E I O U Á É Í Ó Ú Ä Ë Ï Ö Ü ;
    Consonant = b c d f g h j k l m n ñ p q r s t v w x y þ %{w%}
                B C D F G H J K L M N Ñ P Q R S T V W X Y Þ ;

Rules

"Convert cu-/co to qu when followed by a vowel"
    c:q <=> _ %{stemu2o%}:u :0* :Vowel ;

"Deleting a short vowel from a triggered deletion"  ! {strongi} should not be included here
    [ a:0 | e:0 | i:0 | o:0 | u:0 ] <=> _ :0* %{%-V%}: ;

"A 'strong i' is deleted if followed by another i"
    %{strongi%}:0 <=> _ :0* :i ;

"Stems that alter when no suffix is attached"
    [ %{stemd20%}:0 | %{stemt20%}:0 | %{stems20%}:0 | %{stemn20%}:0 |
      %{stemm2n%}:n | %{stemu2o%}:o | %{steme2é%}:é | %{stemi2í%}:í ]
        <=> _ [\%>:]* %>: # ;

"Assimilate r to l when at a morpheme boundary"
    r:l <=> _ %>: %{L%}: ;
"Optionally assimilate n,s to l when at a morpheme boundary"
    [ n:l | s:l ] => _ %>: %{L%}: ;

"Morpheme boundary turns into e if the l didn't cause assimilation"
    %>:e <=> [:Consonant - :l] _ %{L%}: ;

"Morpheme boundary optionally turns into e if the l was always l"
    %>:e => l _ %{L%}: ;

"Morpheme boundary turns into an e when surrounded by consonants"
    %>:e <= :Consonant _ :Consonant ; !! for syntax highlighting

! "But it can turn into 0 still when the environment is Vn>nV"
    ! %>:0 => :Vowel :n _ :n :Vowel ;
